Nevada, session 83, AB290.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 687B of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 2 to 18, inclusive, of this
act.
Sec. 2. As used in NRS 687B.225 and sections 2 to 18,
inclusive, of this act, unless the context otherwise requires, the
words and terms defined in sections 3 to 12, inclusive, of this act
have the meanings ascribed to them in those sections.
Sec. 3. “Adverse determination” means a determination by a
health carrier that an admission or other medical care or dental
care that is a covered benefit has been reviewed and, based upon
the information provided, does not meet the health carrier’s
requirements for medical necessity, appropriateness, health care
setting, level of care or effectiveness, and the requested care or
service or payment for the care or service is therefore denied.
Sec. 4. “Emergency services” means health care services
that are provided by a provider of health care to screen and to
stabilize an insured after the sudden onset of a medical condition
that manifests itself by symptoms of such sufficient severity that a
prudent person would believe that the absence of immediate
medical attention could result in:
1. Serious jeopardy to the health of the insured;
2. Serious jeopardy to the health of a fetus of the insured;
3. Serious impairment of a bodily function of the insured; or
4. Serious dysfunction of any bodily organ or part of the
insured.
Sec. 5. “Health carrier” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 695G.024, and includes, without limitation, an organization
for dental care. The term additionally includes a utilization review
organization, as defined in NRS 695G.085.
Sec. 6. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 7. “Insured” means a policyholder, subscriber, enrollee
or other person covered by a policy or contract of health insurance
issued by a health carrier.
Sec. 8. “Medically necessary” has the meaning ascribed to it
in NRS 695G.055.
Sec. 9. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 10. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 11. “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed
to it in NRS 695G.070.
Sec. 12. “Urgent health care”:
-
*AB290_R1*

– 5 –
1. Means health care that, in the opinion of a provider of
health care with knowledge of an insured’s medical condition, if
not rendered to the insured within 48 hours could:
(a) Seriously jeopardize the life or health of the insured or the
ability of the insured to regain maximum function; or
(b) Subject the insured to severe pain that cannot be
adequately managed without receiving such care.
2. Does not include emergency services.
Sec. 12.2. NRS 687B.225 and sections 2 to 17, inclusive, of
this act, do not apply to a health maintenance organization or
other managed care organization that enters into a contract with
the Department of Health and Human Services or the Division of
Health Care Financing and Policy of the Department pursuant to
NRS 422.273 to provide health care services to recipients of
Medicaid under the State Plan for Medicaid or insurance under
the Children’s Health Insurance Program to the extent that the
organization is providing such services.
Sec. 12.5. 1. If a health carrier utilizes an artificial
intelligence system or automated decision tool to process requests
for prior authorization, the health carrier shall make available, in
a place that is readily accessible and conspicuous to insureds and
the public:
(a) A statement that the health carrier utilizes an artificial
intelligence system or automated decision tool to process requests
for prior authorization;
(b) A general description of how the artificial intelligence
system or automated decision tool works; and
(c) A description of the specific types of information or data
utilized by the artificial intelligence system or automated decision
tool to generate an outcome.
2. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3, a health
carrier shall not utilize or employ an artificial intelligence system
or automated decision tool to:
(a) Make an adverse determination on a request for prior
authorization; or
(b) Terminate, reduce or modify coverage for medical or
dental care that was previously approved by the health carrier.
3. A health carrier may utilize or employ an artificial
intelligence system or automated decision tool for a purpose
described in subsection 2 if, when the artificial intelligence system
or automated decision tool generates an outcome on a request for
prior authorization, the request is independently reviewed by a
physician or, for a request involving dental care, a dentist, who
meets the requirements set forth in paragraph (a) of subsection 1
of section 13 of this act.
-
*AB290_R1*

– 6 –
4. As used in this section:
(a) “Artificial intelligence system” means a machine-based
system that can, for a given set of human-defined objectives, make
predictions, recommendations or decisions influencing real or
virtual environments.
(b) “Automated decision tool” means an automated or
computerized system that is specifically developed or modified to
make, or be a controlling factor in making, consequential
decisions.
Sec. 13. 1. A health carrier shall not make an adverse
determination on a request for prior authorization unless:
(a) The adverse determination is made by a physician or, for
dental care, a dentist, who:
(1) Holds an unrestricted license to practice medicine or
dentistry, as applicable, in any state or territory of the United
States; and
(2) Has knowledge or training regarding the treatment of
the medical or dental condition involved in the request or has
experience treating or managing the medical or dental condition
involved in the request; and
(b) The adverse determination is reviewed and affirmed by:
(1) A medical director of the health carrier or a similar
employee who is in charge of the medical operations of the health
carrier; or
(2) A physician or, for dental care, a dentist, who:
(I) Has been designated by the medical director or
similar employee to review the adverse determination; and
(II) Is employed by or contracted with the health carrier
specifically to perform reviews or appeals of adverse
determinations.
2. If a physician or dentist described in paragraph (a) of
subsection 1 is considering making an adverse determination on a
request for prior authorization on the basis that the medical or
dental care involved in the request is not medically necessary, the
health carrier that received the request shall:
(a) Notify the provider of health care who submitted the
request, or the person designated by the provider of health care to
manage requests for prior authorization, that the medical
necessity of the requested care is being questioned by the health
carrier; and
(b) Offer the provider of health care who submitted the
request, or a colleague of that provider of health care who has the
knowledge and ability to provide additional information with
respect to the request, an opportunity to speak with the physician
or dentist, as applicable, over the telephone or by videoconference
-
*AB290_R1*

– 7 –
to discuss the clinical issues involved in the request before the
physician or dentist renders an initial determination on the
request.
3. Upon rendering an adverse determination on a request for
prior authorization, a health carrier shall immediately transmit to
the insured to whom the request pertains a written notice that
contains:
(a) A specific description of all reasons that the health carrier
made the adverse determination;
(b) A description of any documentation that the health carrier
requested from the insured or a provider of health care of the
insured and did not receive or deemed insufficient, if the failure to
receive sufficient documentation contributed to the adverse
determination;
(c) A statement that the insured has the right to appeal the
adverse determination;
(d) Instructions, written in clear language that is
understandable to an ordinary layperson, describing how the
insured can appeal the adverse determination through the process
established pursuant to subsection 4; and
(e) A description of any documentation that may be necessary
or pertinent to a potential appeal.
4. A health carrier shall establish a process that allows an
insured to appeal an adverse determination on a request for prior
authorization. The process must allow for the clear resolution of
each appeal within a reasonable time.
5. A health carrier shall not uphold on appeal an adverse
determination pertaining to a request for prior authorization
unless the decision on the appeal is made by a physician or, for
dental care, a dentist, who:
(a) Holds an unrestricted license to practice medicine or
dentistry, as applicable, in any state or territory of the United
States;
(b) Has knowledge or training regarding the treatment of the
medical or dental condition involved in the request or has
experience treating or managing the medical or dental condition
involved in the request;
(c) Was not involved in making the adverse determination that
is the subject of the appeal;
(d) Considers all known clinical aspects of the medical or
dental care involved in the request; and
(e) Is employed by or contracted with the health carrier:
(1) To participate in the network of the health carrier in his
or her capacity as a practicing physician or dentist, as applicable;
or
-
*AB290_R1*

– 8 –
(2) Primarily to make determinations on reviews or appeals
of adverse determinations.
6. As used in this section:
(a) “Network” means a defined set of providers of health care
who are under contract with a health carrier to provide health
care services pursuant to a network plan offered or issued by the
health carrier.
(b) “Network plan” means a contract or policy of insurance
offered by a health carrier under which the financing and delivery
of medical or dental care is provided, in whole or in part, through
a defined set of providers under contract with the health carrier.
Sec. 14. 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2, if
a health carrier approves a request for prior authorization and the
process to provide the approved medical or dental care has been
initiated, the approval remains valid until 6 months after the date
on which the request is approved.
2. Except as otherwise provided in this this subsection, if a
health carrier approves a request for prior authorization for a
continuous course of treatment that relates to a chronic or long-
term condition which is specifically identified in the request for
prior authorization, the approval remains valid until 12 months
after the date on which the health carrier approved the request. A
health carrier may require additional prior authorization for
medical or dental care that represents a substantial deviation from
the course of treatment indicated in the previous request for prior
authorization that was approved by the health carrier.
3. A health carrier shall not revoke or impose an additional
limit, condition or restriction on a request for prior authorization
that the health carrier has previously approved unless:
(a) The health carrier determines that an insured or a provider
of health care procured the approval by fraud or material
misrepresentation;
(b) The health carrier determines that the care at issue in the
request was not covered by the health carrier at the time the care
was provided; or
(c) The coverage period of the policy or contract of insurance
under which the insured was covered at the time of the approval
has ended and the insured is currently covered under a different
policy or contract of insurance which imposes a lower cost-
sharing obligation for the relevant medical or dental care.
4. A health carrier that has approved a request for prior
authorization shall not deny or refuse to promptly pay a claim for
the approved medical or dental care unless the health carrier
determines that the insured or provider of health care procured
the prior authorization by fraud or material misrepresentation.
-
*AB290_R1*

– 9 –
5. Within the first 90 days of the coverage period for an
insured, a health carrier shall honor a request for prior
authorization that has been approved by a health carrier or other
entity that previously provided the insured with coverage for
medical or dental care if:
(a) The approval was issued within the 6 months immediately
preceding the first day of the coverage period under the current
contract or policy of insurance;
(b) The insured or his or her provider of health care furnishes
the health carrier with complete documentation with respect to the
prior approval in a timely manner, if the health carrier requests
such documentation; and
(c) The specific medical or dental care included within the
request is not affirmatively excluded under the terms and
conditions of the contract or policy of insurance issued by the
health carrier.
6. Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit a
health carrier from subsequently reducing or eliminating a cost-
sharing obligation imposed against an insured for medical or
dental care for which the health carrier has previously granted
prior authorization.
7. As used in this section, “coverage period” means the
current term of a contract or policy of insurance issued by a
health carrier.
Sec. 15. 1. A health carrier shall not require prior
authorization for emergency services covered by the health
carrier, including, where applicable, transportation by ambulance
to a hospital or other medical facility.
2. If a health carrier requires an insured or his or her
provider of health care to notify the health carrier that the insured
has been admitted to a hospital to receive emergency services or
has received emergency services, the health carrier shall not
require an insured or a provider of health care to transmit such a
notice earlier than the end of the business day immediately
following the day after the date on which the insured was admitted
or the emergency services were provided, as applicable.
Sec. 16. 1. If a health carrier violates NRS 687B.225 or
section 12.5, 13, 14 or 15 of this act with respect to a particular
request for prior authorization, the request shall be deemed
approved.
2. Nothing in NRS 687B.225 or sections 12.5 to 15, inclusive,
of this act shall be construed to require a health carrier to provide
coverage:
-
*AB290_R1*

– 10 –
(a) For medical or dental care that, regardless of whether such
care is medically necessary, would not be a covered benefit under
the terms and conditions of the contract or policy of insurance;
(b) To a person who is not insured by the health carrier on the
date on which medical or dental care is provided to the person; or
(c) To an insured who, as a result of his or her failure to pay
the applicable premiums required under the terms and conditions
of a contract or policy of insurance, has no coverage under the
contract or policy on the date on which medical or dental care is
provided to the insured.
Sec. 17. 1. On or before March 1 of each calendar year, a
health carrier that requires insureds to obtain prior authorization
for medical or dental care shall compile and transmit to the
Commissioner, in a form prescribed by the Commissioner, and
publish on an Internet website maintained by the health carrier in
an easily accessible format the following information for the
immediately preceding plan year, in aggregated form for all
requests for prior authorization received by the health carrier
during the immediately preceding plan year for urgent and non-
urgent care and disaggregated in accordance with subsection 2:
(a) The number of initial requests for prior authorization for
medical or dental care in this State that were approved upon initial
review;
(b) The number of initial requests for prior authorization for
medical or dental care in this State that resulted in an adverse
determination upon initial review;
(c) The number of the adverse determinations described in
paragraph (b) that were appealed;
(d) The number of appeals of adverse determinations described
in paragraph (c) that resulted in a reversal of the adverse
determination;
(e) The five most common reasons for the adverse
determinations described in paragraph (b); and
(f) The average time between:
(1) The submission of an initial request for prior
authorization for medical or dental care in this State and the
response to the request; and
(2) The submission of an appeal of an adverse
determination on a request for prior authorization for medical or
dental care in this State and the resolution of the appeal.
2. The information described in subsection 1 must be
disaggregated for the following categories:
(a) Requests for urgent health care and non-urgent health
care;
-
*AB290_R1*

– 11 –
(b) The specialty of the provider of health care who submitted
a request for prior authorization; and
(c) The types of medical or dental care at issue in the request
for prior authorization, including the specific types of prescription
drugs, procedures or diagnostic tests involved in the requests.
3. A health carrier shall not include individually identifiable
health information in the information published pursuant to
subsection 1.
4. On or before May 1 of each even-numbered year, the
Commissioner shall:
(a) Compile a report summarizing the information submitted
to the Commissioner pursuant to subsection 1 during the
immediately preceding biennium and providing recommendations
for legislation to improve the process for obtaining prior
authorization; and
(b) Submit the report and all information provided to the
Commissioner pursuant to subsection 1 to the Director of the
Legislative Counsel Bureau for transmittal to the Joint Interim
Standing Committee on Health and Human Services and the Joint
Interim Standing Committee on Commerce and Labor.
5. As used in this section, “individually identifiable health
information” means information relating to the provision of
medical or dental care to an insured:
(a) That specifically identifies the insured; or
(b) For which there is a reasonable basis to believe that the
information can be used to identify the insured.
Sec. 18. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 19. NRS 687B.225 is hereby amended to read as follows:
687B.225 1. Except as otherwise provided in NRS
689A.0405, 689A.0412, 689A.0413, 689A.0418, 689A.0437,
689A.044, 689A.0445, 689A.0459, 689B.031, 689B.0312,
689B.0313, 689B.0315, 689B.0317, 689B.0319, 689B.0374,
689B.0378, 689C.1665, 689C.1671, 689C.1675, 689C.1676,
695A.1843, 695A.1856, 695A.1865, 695A.1874, 695B.1912,
695B.1913, 695B.1914, 695B.1919, 695B.19197, 695B.1924,
695B.1925, 695B.1942, 695C.1696, 695C.1699, 695C.1713,
695C.1735, 695C.1737, 695C.1743, 695C.1745, 695C.1751,
695G.170, 695G.1705, 695G.171, 695G.1714, 695G.1715,
695G.1719 and 695G.177, and section 15 of this act, any contract
[for group, blanket or individual health] or policy of insurance [or
any contract by a nonprofit hospital, medical or dental service
corporation or organization for dental care] issued by a health
carrier which provides for payment of a certain part of medical or
dental care may require the insured [or member] to obtain prior
authorization for that care from the [insurer or organization. The
-
*AB290_R1*

– 12 –
insurer or organization] health carrier in a manner consistent with
this section and sections 2 to 18, inclusive, of this act.
2. A health carrier that requires an insured to obtain prior
authorization shall:
(a) File its procedure for obtaining [approval of care] prior
authorization pursuant to this section , including, without
limitation, a list of the items and services for which the health
carrier requires prior authorization and the clinical review criteria
used by the health carrier to evaluate requests for prior
authorization, for approval by the Commissioner . [; and]
(b) Unless a shorter time period is prescribed by a specific
statute, including, without limitation, NRS 689A.0446, 689B.0361,
689C.1688, 695A.1859, 695B.19087, 695C.16932 and 695G.1703,
[respond to] and except as otherwise provided by paragraph (c),
approve or make an adverse determination on any request for
[approval by the insured or member] prior authorization submitted
by or on behalf of the insured pursuant to this section [within 20
days after it receives the request.] and notify the insured and his or
her provider of health care, or the person designated by the
provider of health care to manage requests for prior authorization,
of the approval or adverse determination:
(1) For non-urgent medical or dental care, within 7 days
after receiving the request.
(2) For urgent health care, within 48 hours after receiving
the request.
(c) If the health carrier requires additional, medically relevant
information or documentation in order to adequately evaluate a
request for prior authorization:
(1) Notify the insured and the provider of health care who
submitted the request, or the person designated by the provider of
health care to manage requests for prior authorization, within the
applicable amount of time described in paragraph (b) that
additional information is required to evaluate the request;
(2) Include within the notification sent pursuant to
subparagraph (1) a description, with reasonable specificity, of the
information that the health carrier requires to make a
determination on the request for prior authorization; and
(3) Approve or make an adverse determination on the
request:
(I) For non-urgent medical or dental care, within 7 days
after receiving the information.
(II) For urgent health care, within 48 hours after
receiving the information.
[2.] 3. The procedure for prior authorization may not
discriminate among persons licensed to provide the covered care.
-
*AB290_R1*

– 13 –
4. A health carrier shall publish its procedures for obtaining
prior authorization, including, without limitation, the clinical
review criteria and the list of items and services for which the
health carrier requires prior authorization and the dates on which
the health carrier began requiring prior authorization in this State
for each item or service, on its Internet website:
(a) Using clear language that is understandable to an ordinary
layperson, where practicable; and
(b) In a place that is readily accessible and conspicuous to
insureds and the public.
5. A health carrier shall not deny a claim based on the failure
of an insured to obtain prior authorization for medical or dental
care if the procedure for obtaining prior authorization established
by the health carrier did not require the insured to obtain prior
authorization for that medical or dental care on the date that the
medical or dental care was provided to the insured.
6. As used in this section, “clinical review criteria” means
any written screening procedure, decision abstract, clinical
protocol or practice guideline used by the health carrier to
determine the necessity and appropriateness of medical or dental
care.
Sec. 20. NRS 695B.320 is hereby amended to read as follows:
695B.320 1. Nonprofit hospital and medical or dental service
corporations are subject to the provisions of this chapter, and to the
provisions of chapters 679A and 679B of NRS, subsections 2, 4, 17,
18 and 30 of NRS 680B.010, NRS 680B.025 to 680B.060,
inclusive, chapter 681B of NRS, NRS 686A.010 to 686A.315,
inclusive, 686B.010 to 686B.175, inclusive, 687B.010 to
687B.040, inclusive, 687B.070 to 687B.140, inclusive, 687B.150,
687B.160, 687B.180, 687B.200 to 687B.255, inclusive, and
sections 2 to 18, inclusive, of this act, 687B.270, 687B.310 to
687B.380, inclusive, 687B.410, 687B.420, 687B.430, 687B.500 and
chapters 692B, 692C, 693A and 696B of NRS, to the extent
applicable and not in conflict with the express provisions of this
chapter.
2. For the purposes of this section and the provisions set forth
in subsection 1, a nonprofit hospital and medical or dental service
corporation is included in the meaning of the term “insurer.”
Sec. 21. NRS 232.320 is hereby amended to read as follows:
232.320 1. The Director:
(a) Shall appoint, with the consent of the Governor,
administrators of the divisions of the Department, who are
respectively designated as follows:
(1) The Administrator of the Aging and Disability Services
Division;
-
*AB290_R1*

– 14 –
(2) The Administrator of the Division of Welfare and
Supportive Services;
(3) The Administrator of the Division of Child and Family
Services;
(4) The Administrator of the Division of Health Care
Financing and Policy; and
(5) The Administrator of the Division of Public and
Behavioral Health.
(b) Shall administer, through the divisions of the Department,
the provisions of chapters 63, 424, 425, 427A, 432A to 442,
inclusive, 446 to 450, inclusive, 458A and 656A of NRS, NRS
127.220 to 127.310, inclusive, 422.001 to 422.410, inclusive, and
sections 25 to 41, inclusive, of this act, 422.580, 432.010 to
432.133, inclusive, 432B.6201 to 432B.626, inclusive, 444.002 to
444.430, inclusive, and 445A.010 to 445A.055, inclusive, and all
other provisions of law relating to the functions of the divisions of
the Department, but is not responsible for the clinical activities of
the Division of Public and Behavioral Health or the professional line
activities of the other divisions.
(c) Shall administer any state program for persons with
developmental disabilities established pursuant to the
Developmental Disabilities Assistance and Bill of Rights Act of
2000, 42 U.S.C. §§ 15001 et seq.
(d) Shall, after considering advice from agencies of local
governments and nonprofit organizations which provide social
services, adopt a master plan for the provision of human services in
this State. The Director shall revise the plan biennially and deliver a
copy of the plan to the Governor and the Legislature at the
beginning of each regular session. The plan must:
(1) Identify and assess the plans and programs of the
Department for the provision of human services, and any
duplication of those services by federal, state and local agencies;
(2) Set forth priorities for the provision of those services;
(3) Provide for communication and the coordination of those
services among nonprofit organizations, agencies of local
government, the State and the Federal Government;
(4) Identify the sources of funding for services provided by
the Department and the allocation of that funding;
(5) Set forth sufficient information to assist the Department
in providing those services and in the planning and budgeting for the
future provision of those services; and
(6) Contain any other information necessary for the
Department to communicate effectively with the Federal
Government concerning demographic trends, formulas for the
-
*AB290_R1*

– 15 –
distribution of federal money and any need for the modification of
programs administered by the Department.
(e) May, by regulation, require nonprofit organizations and state
and local governmental agencies to provide information regarding
the programs of those organizations and agencies, excluding
detailed information relating to their budgets and payrolls, which the
Director deems necessary for the performance of the duties imposed
upon him or her pursuant to this section.
(f) Has such other powers and duties as are provided by law.
2. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the Director, or
the Director’s designee, is responsible for appointing and removing
subordinate officers and employees of the Department.
Sec. 22. NRS 287.010 is hereby amended to read as follows:
287.010 1. The governing body of any county, school
district, municipal corporation, political subdivision, public
corporation or other local governmental agency of the State of
Nevada may:
(a) Adopt and carry into effect a system of group life, accident
or health insurance, or any combination thereof, for the benefit of its
officers and employees, and the dependents of officers and
employees who elect to accept the insurance and who, where
necessary, have authorized the governing body to make deductions
from their compensation for the payment of premiums on the
insurance.
(b) Purchase group policies of life, accident or health insurance,
or any combination thereof, for the benefit of such officers and
employees, and the dependents of such officers and employees, as
have authorized the purchase, from insurance companies authorized
to transact the business of such insurance in the State of Nevada,
and, where necessary, deduct from the compensation of officers and
employees the premiums upon insurance and pay the deductions
upon the premiums.
(c) Provide group life, accident or health coverage through a
self-insurance reserve fund and, where necessary, deduct
contributions to the maintenance of the fund from the compensation
of officers and employees and pay the deductions into the fund. The
money accumulated for this purpose through deductions from the
compensation of officers and employees and contributions of the
governing body must be maintained as an internal service fund as
defined by NRS 354.543. The money must be deposited in a state or
national bank or credit union authorized to transact business in the
State of Nevada. Any independent administrator of a fund created
under this section is subject to the licensing requirements of chapter
683A of NRS, and must be a resident of this State. Any contract
with an independent administrator must be approved by the
-
*AB290_R1*

– 16 –
Commissioner of Insurance as to the reasonableness of
administrative charges in relation to contributions collected and
benefits provided. The provisions of NRS 439.581 to 439.597,
inclusive, 686A.135, paragraphs (b) and (c) of subsection 2 and
subsections 1, 3, 4 and 5 of NRS 687B.225, 687B.352, 687B.408,
687B.692, [687B.723,] 687B.725, 687B.805, 689B.030 to
689B.0317, inclusive, paragraphs (b) and (c) of subsection 1 of NRS
689B.0319, subsections 2, 4, 6 and 7 of NRS 689B.0319, 689B.033
to 689B.0369, inclusive, 689B.0375 to 689B.050, inclusive,
689B.0675, 689B.265, 689B.287 and 689B.500 and sections 2 to
18, inclusive, of this act apply to coverage provided pursuant to this
paragraph, except that the provisions of NRS 689B.0378,
689B.03785 and 689B.500 only apply to coverage for active officers
and employees of the governing body, or the dependents of such
officers and employees.
(d) Defray part or all of the cost of maintenance of a self-
insurance fund or of the premiums upon insurance. The money for
contributions must be budgeted for in accordance with the laws
governing the county, school district, municipal corporation,
political subdivision, public corporation or other local governmental
agency of the State of Nevada.
2. If a school district offers group insurance to its officers and
employees pursuant to this section, members of the board of trustees
of the school district must not be excluded from participating in the
group insurance. If the amount of the deductions from compensation
required to pay for the group insurance exceeds the compensation to
which a trustee is entitled, the difference must be paid by the trustee.
3. In any county in which a legal services organization exists,
the governing body of the county, or of any school district,
municipal corporation, political subdivision, public corporation or
other local governmental agency of the State of Nevada in the
county, may enter into a contract with the legal services
organization pursuant to which the officers and employees of the
legal services organization, and the dependents of those officers and
employees, are eligible for any life, accident or health insurance
provided pursuant to this section to the officers and employees, and
the dependents of the officers and employees, of the county, school
district, municipal corporation, political subdivision, public
corporation or other local governmental agency.
4. If a contract is entered into pursuant to subsection 3, the
officers and employees of the legal services organization:
(a) Shall be deemed, solely for the purposes of this section, to be
officers and employees of the county, school district, municipal
corporation, political subdivision, public corporation or other local
-
*AB290_R1*

– 17 –
governmental agency with which the legal services organization has
contracted; and
(b) Must be required by the contract to pay the premiums or
contributions for all insurance which they elect to accept or of which
they authorize the purchase.
5. A contract that is entered into pursuant to subsection 3:
(a) Must be submitted to the Commissioner of Insurance for
approval not less than 30 days before the date on which the contract
is to become effective.
(b) Does not become effective unless approved by the
Commissioner.
(c) Shall be deemed to be approved if not disapproved by the
Commissioner within 30 days after its submission.
6. As used in this section, “legal services organization” means
an organization that operates a program for legal aid and receives
money pursuant to NRS 19.031.
Sec. 23. NRS 287.04335 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
287.04335 If the Board provides health insurance through a
plan of self-insurance, it shall comply with the provisions of
NRS 439.581 to 439.597, inclusive, 686A.135, paragraphs (b) and
(c) of subsection 2 and subsections 1, 3, 4 and 5 of NRS 687B.225,
687B.352, 687B.409, 687B.692, [687B.723,] 687B.725, 687B.805,
689B.0353, 689B.255, 695C.1723, 695G.150, 695G.155, 695G.160,
695G.162, 695G.1635, 695G.164, 695G.1645, 695G.1665,
695G.167, 695G.1675, 695G.170 to 695G.1712, inclusive,
695G.1714 to 695G.174, inclusive, 695G.176, 695G.177, 695G.200
to 695G.230, inclusive, 695G.241 to 695G.310, inclusive, 695G.405
and 695G.415, and sections 2 to 18, inclusive, of this act in the
same manner as an insurer that is licensed pursuant to title 57 of
NRS is required to comply with those provisions.
Sec. 24. Chapter 422 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 25 to 41, inclusive, of this
act.
Sec. 25. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 26. As used in sections 26 to 41, inclusive, of this act,
unless the context otherwise requires, the words and terms defined
in sections 27 to 33, inclusive, of this act have the meanings
ascribed to them in those sections.
Sec. 27. “Adverse determination” means a determination by
the Department or a Medicaid managed care entity that an
admission or other medical care or dental care that is a covered
benefit has been reviewed and, based upon the information
provided, does not meet the relevant requirements for medical
necessity, appropriateness, health care setting, level of care or
-
*AB290_R1*

– 18 –
effectiveness, and the requested care or service or payment for the
care or service is therefore denied.
Sec. 28. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 29. “Individually identifiable health information”
means information relating to the provision of health care to a
recipient:
1. That specifically identifies the recipient; or
2. For which there is a reasonable basis to believe that the
information can be used to identify the recipient.
Sec. 29.5. “Medicaid managed care entity” means:
1. A health maintenance organization or other managed care
organization that enters into a contract with the Department or the
Division pursuant to NRS 422.273 to provide health care services
to recipients of Medicaid under the State Plan for Medicaid or the
Children’s Health Insurance Program; or
2. A utilization review organization, as defined in NRS
695G.085, that conducts utilization reviews for the Department or
a health maintenance organization or managed care organization
described in subsection 1 with respect to Medicaid or the
Children’s Health Insurance Program.
Sec. 30. 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2 or
where otherwise required by federal law, “medically necessary”
has the meaning ascribed to it in NRS 695G.055.
2. If federal law or regulations define “medically necessary”
for purposes related to Medicaid or the Children’s Health
Insurance Program differently from the manner in which that
term is defined in subsection 1, the Department may, by
regulation, adopt the definition established by federal law or
regulations. Any such definition supersedes the definition
established in subsection 1.
Sec. 31. “Provider of health care” means a person who
participates in the State Plan for Medicaid or the Children’s
Health Insurance Program as a provider of items or services.
Sec. 32. “Recipient” means a natural person who receives
benefits through Medicaid or the Children’s Health Insurance
Program, as applicable.
Sec. 33. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 34. 1. The Department, with respect to Medicaid and
the Children’s Health Insurance Program, shall establish written
procedures for obtaining prior authorization for medical or dental
care which:
(a) Apply to the delivery of medical or dental care to recipients
of Medicaid or the Children’s Health Insurance Program:
(1) Directly by the Department; and
-
*AB290_R1*

– 19 –
(2) Through managed care in accordance with NRS
422.273; and
(b) Must include, without limitation:
(1) A list of the items and services for which the Department
requires prior authorization; and
(2) A description of the clinical review criteria used by the
Department.
2. The Department and each Medicaid managed care entity
shall publish the written procedures for obtaining prior
authorization established by the Department pursuant to
subsection 1, including, without limitation, the clinical review
criteria, on an Internet website maintained by the Department or
the Medicaid managed care entity, as applicable:
(a) Using clear language that is understandable to an ordinary
layperson, where practicable; and
(b) In a place that is readily accessible and conspicuous to
recipients and the public.
3. If the Department amends the procedure for obtaining
prior authorization adopted pursuant to subsection 1, including,
without limitation, changing the items and services for which the
Department requires prior authorization or changing the clinical
review criteria used by the Department, the Department and each
Medicaid managed care entity shall update the information
published on its Internet website pursuant to subsection 2 to
reflect the amended procedure for obtaining prior authorization
and the date on which the amended procedure takes effect.
4. A change to the Department’s procedure for obtaining
prior authorization may not take effect until the date on which the
Department updated the information published on its Internet
website pursuant to subsection 3.
5. The Department or a Medicaid managed care entity shall
not deny a claim based on the failure of a recipient to obtain prior
authorization for medical or dental care if the procedure for
obtaining prior authorization established by the Department
pursuant to this section did not require the recipient to obtain
prior authorization for that medical or dental care on the date that
the medical or dental care was provided to the recipient.
6. As used in this section, “clinical review criteria” means
any written screening procedure, decision abstract, clinical
protocol or practice guideline used by the Department to
determine the necessity and appropriateness of medical or dental
care.
Sec. 35. 1. Unless a shorter time period is prescribed by a
specific statute, and except as otherwise provided in subsections 2
and 3, the Department or a Medicaid managed care entity, with
-
*AB290_R1*

– 20 –
respect to Medicaid and the Children’s Health Insurance
Program, shall approve or make an adverse determination on a
request for prior authorization submitted by or on behalf of a
recipient and notify the recipient and his or her provider of health
care, or the person designated by the provider of health care to
manage requests for prior authorization, of the approval or
adverse determination within 7 days after receiving the request.
2. If the Department or Medicaid managed care entity
requires additional, medically relevant information or
documentation in order to adequately evaluate a request for prior
authorization, the Department or Medicaid managed care entity,
as applicable, shall:
(a) Notify the recipient and the provider of health care who
submitted the request, or the person designated by the provider of
health care to manage requests for prior authorization, within 7
days after receiving the request that additional information is
required to evaluate the request;
(b) Include within the notification sent pursuant to paragraph
(a) a description, with reasonable specificity, of the information
that the Department or Medicaid managed care entity, as
applicable, requires to make a determination on the request for
prior authorization; and
(c) Approve or make an adverse determination on the request
within 7 days after receiving the information.
3. The provisions of this section do not apply to requests for
prior authorization for prescription drugs, for personal care
services or for services which are provided under Medicaid
pursuant to 42 U.S.C. § 1396n(i) or a waiver granted pursuant to
42 U.S.C. § 1396n(c) by the Secretary of Health and Human
Services.
Sec. 36. 1. The Department or a Medicaid managed care
entity, with respect to Medicaid and the Children’s Health
Insurance Program, shall not make an adverse determination on a
request for prior authorization unless the adverse determination is
made by a physician, a pharmacist or, for a request relating to
dental care, a dentist, who:
(a) Holds an unrestricted license to practice medicine,
pharmacy or dentistry, as applicable, in any state or territory of
the United States; and
(b) Is acting within the scope of his or her practice with respect
to evaluating the particular medical or dental care involved in the
request and, to the extent practicable, is of the same or similar
specialty as a physician, pharmacist or dentist, as applicable, who
typically manages or treats the medical or dental condition or
provides the medical or dental care involved in the request.
-
*AB290_R1*

– 21 –
2. Upon rendering an adverse determination on a request for
prior authorization, the Department or a Medicaid managed care
entity, as applicable, shall immediately transmit to the recipient to
whom the request pertains a written notice that contains:
(a) A specific description of all reasons that the Department or
Medicaid managed care entity, as applicable, made the adverse
determination;
(b) A description of any documentation that the Department or
Medicaid managed care entity, as applicable, requested from the
recipient or a provider of health care of the recipient and did not
receive or deemed insufficient, if the failure to receive sufficient
documentation contributed to the adverse determination;
(c) A statement that the recipient has the right to appeal the
adverse determination;
(d) Instructions, written in clear language that is
understandable to an ordinary layperson, describing how the
recipient can appeal the adverse determination through the
process for appeals established pursuant to subsection 3; and
(e) A description of any documentation that may be necessary
or pertinent to a potential appeal.
3. The Department shall establish a process that allows a
recipient to appeal an adverse determination on a request for prior
authorization. The Department may elect to utilize the procedures
for hearings established for appeals of denials of claims of
benefits under Medicaid pursuant to NRS 422.275 to 422.280,
inclusive, to satisfy that requirement. If the Department utilizes
such procedures for that purpose, the Department shall, upon the
request of a hearing officer, make available to the hearing officer
a licensed medical professional, which may include the Medical
Director for Medicaid, as available, to provide clinical input and
expertise which may be necessary to evaluate the appeal of an
adverse determination.
4. Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection 3, a Medicaid
managed care entity may establish a separate process that allows a
recipient to appeal an adverse determination on a request for prior
authorization. If the Medicaid managed care entity does not
reverse the adverse determination after the exhaustion of that
process, the recipient my appeal to the Department pursuant to
subsection 3.
Sec. 37. 1. If the Department or a Medicaid managed care
entity approves a request for prior authorization, the approval
remains valid until 12 months after the date on which the request
is approved or, if federal law establishes a different amount of
time for which a request for prior authorization is required to
remain valid, the amount of time established by the federal law.
-
*AB290_R1*

– 22 –
2. The Department or a Medicaid managed care entity shall
not revoke or impose an additional limit, condition or restriction
on a request for prior authorization that the Department or
Medicaid managed care entity, as applicable, has previously
approved unless:
(a) The care at issue in the request was not provided to the
recipient within 90 business days after the Department or
Medicaid managed care entity, as applicable, received the request;
(b) The Department or Medicaid managed care entity, as
applicable, determines that a recipient or a provider of health care
procured the approval by fraud or material misrepresentation; or
(c) The Department or Medicaid managed care entity, as
applicable, determines that the care at issue in the request was not
covered by Medicaid or the Children’s Health Insurance Program,
as applicable, at the time the care was provided.
3. If the Department or a Medicaid managed care entity has
approved a request for prior authorization, the Department or
Medicaid managed care entity, as applicable, shall not deny or
refuse to promptly pay a clean claim for the approved medical
or dental care unless:
(a) The claim is not timely submitted;
(b) The claim is not submitted in accordance with the
requirements of the Department or the Federal Government; or
(c) The Department or Medicaid managed care entity, as
applicable, determines that the recipient or provider of health care
procured the prior authorization by fraud or material
misrepresentation.
4. If the Department or a Medicaid managed care entity does
not deny a clean claim for approved medical or dental care
pursuant to subsection 3, the Department or Medicaid managed
care entity, as applicable, shall pay the claim at the same rate that
the Department or Medicaid managed care entity, as applicable, is
contractually obligated to or would ordinarily pay a provider of
health care for providing the specific type of care that was
approved and provided to the recipient.
5. As used in this section, “clean claim” has the meaning
ascribed to it in 42 C.F.R. § 447.45.
Sec. 38. 1. The Department or a Medicaid managed care
entity, with respect to Medicaid and the Children’s Health
Insurance Program, shall not require prior authorization for
covered emergency services, including, where applicable,
transportation by ambulance to a hospital or other medical
facility.
2. If the Department or a Medicaid managed care entity
requires a recipient or his or her provider of health care to notify
-
*AB290_R1*

– 23 –
the Department or Medicaid managed care entity, as applicable,
that the recipient has been admitted to a hospital to receive
emergency services or has received emergency services, the
Department or Medicaid managed care entity, as applicable, shall
not require a recipient or a provider of health care to transmit
such a notice earlier than the end of the business day immediately
following the day after the date on which the recipient was
admitted or the emergency services were provided, as applicable.
3. The Department or a Medicaid managed care entity shall
not deny coverage for emergency services covered by Medicaid or
the Children’s Health Insurance Program that are medically
necessary. Emergency services are presumed to be medically
necessary if, within 72 hours after a recipient is admitted to
receive emergency services, the recipient’s provider of health care
transmits to the Department or Medicaid managed care entity, as
applicable, a certification, in writing, that the condition of the
recipient required emergency services. The Department or
Medicaid managed care entity may rebut that presumption by
establishing, by clear and convincing evidence, that the emergency
services were not medically necessary.
4. As used in this section, “emergency services” means health
care services that are provided by a provider of health care to
screen and to stabilize a recipient after the sudden onset of a
medical condition that manifests itself by symptoms of such
sufficient severity that a prudent person would believe that the
absence of immediate medical attention could result in:
(a) Serious jeopardy to the health of the recipient;
(b) Serious jeopardy to the health of a fetus of the recipient;
(c) Serious impairment of a bodily function of the recipient; or
(d) Serious dysfunction of any bodily organ or part of the
recipient.
Sec. 39. Nothing in sections 34 to 38, inclusive, of this act
shall be construed to require the Department or a Medicaid
managed care entity to provide coverage:
1. For medical or dental care that, regardless of whether such
care is medically necessary, would not be a covered benefit under
the terms and conditions of Medicaid or the Children’s Health
Insurance Program, as applicable; or
2. To a person who is not a recipient or is not otherwise
eligible to receive coverage under Medicaid or the Children’s
Health Insurance Program, as applicable, on the date on which
medical or dental care is provided to the person.
Sec. 40. 1. On or before March 1 of each calendar year, the
Department and each Medicaid managed care entity shall publish
on an Internet website maintained by the Department or Medicaid
-
*AB290_R1*

– 24 –
managed care entity, as applicable, in an easily accessible format
the following information for the immediately preceding calendar
year, in aggregated form for all requests for prior authorization
received by the Department or Medicaid managed care entity, as
applicable, during the immediately preceding year and
disaggregated in accordance with subsection 2:
(a) The number of initial requests for prior authorization for
medical or dental care that were approved upon initial review;
(b) The number of initial requests for prior authorization for
medical or dental care that resulted in an adverse determination
upon initial review;
(c) The number of the adverse determinations described in
paragraph (b) that were appealed;
(d) The number of appeals of adverse determinations described
in paragraph (c) that resulted in a reversal of the adverse
determination;
(e) The five most common reasons for the adverse
determinations described in paragraph (b); and
(f) The average time between:
(1) The submission of an initial request for prior
authorization for medical or dental care in this State and the
response to the request; and
(2) The submission of an appeal of an adverse
determination on a request for prior authorization for medical or
dental care and the resolution of the appeal.
2. The information described in subsection 1 must be
disaggregated for the following categories:
(a) The specialty of the provider of health care who submitted
a request for prior authorization; and
(b) The types of medical or dental care at issue in the request
for prior authorization, including the specific types of prescription
drugs, procedures or diagnostic tests involved in the requests.
3. The Department or a Medicaid managed care entity shall
not include individually identifiable health information in the
information published pursuant to subsection 1.
Sec. 41. 1. On or before March 1 of each calendar year, the
Department and each Medicaid managed care entity shall:
(a) Compile a report containing the following information for
Medicaid and the Children’s Health Insurance Program:
(1) The items and services for which the Department or
Medicaid managed care entity requires prior authorization and,
for each item or service:
(I) The date on which the Department or Medicaid
managed care entity began requiring prior authorization for that
item or service;
-
*AB290_R1*

– 25 –
(II) The number of requests for prior authorization
received by the Department or Medicaid managed care entity
during the immediately preceding calendar year for the provision
of the item or service;
(III) The number and percentage of the requests listed
pursuant to sub-subparagraph (II) that were approved;
(IV) The number and percentage of the requests listed
pursuant to sub-subparagraph (II) that resulted in adverse
determinations; and
(V) The number of appeals from adverse determinations
during the immediately preceding calendar year and the
percentage of those appeals that were reversed on appeal by the
Department or Medicaid managed care entity;
(2) For all requests for prior authorization received by the
Department or Medicaid managed care entity during the
immediately preceding calendar year, the average and median
time between:
(I) The Department or Medicaid managed care entity
receiving a request for prior authorization and the Department or
Medicaid managed care entity approving or making an adverse
determination on the request; and
(II) The submission of an appeal of an adverse
determination on a request for prior authorization and the
resolution of the appeal;
(b) Post the report on the Internet website maintained by the
Department or Medicaid managed care entity; and
(c) Submit the report to the Director of the Legislative Counsel
Bureau for transmittal to the Joint Interim Standing Committee
on Health and Human Services.
2. The Department or a Medicaid managed care entity shall
not include individually identifiable health information in a report
published pursuant to subsection 1.
Sec. 42. NRS 422.403 is hereby amended to read as follows:
422.403 1. The Department shall, by regulation, establish and
manage the use by the Medicaid program of step therapy and prior
authorization for prescription drugs.
2. The Drug Use Review Board shall:
(a) Advise the Department concerning the use by the Medicaid
program of step therapy and prior authorization for prescription
drugs;
(b) Develop step therapy protocols and prior authorization
policies and procedures that comply with the provisions of sections
26 to 41, inclusive, of this act for use by the Medicaid program for
prescription drugs; and
-
*AB290_R1*

– 26 –
(c) Review and approve, based on clinical evidence and best
clinical practice guidelines and without consideration of the cost of
the prescription drugs being considered, step therapy protocols used
by the Medicaid program for prescription drugs.
3. The step therapy protocol established pursuant to this section
must not apply to a drug approved by the Food and Drug
Administration that is prescribed to treat a psychiatric condition of a
recipient of Medicaid, if:
(a) The drug has been approved by the Food and Drug
Administration with indications for the psychiatric condition of the
insured or the use of the drug to treat that psychiatric condition is
otherwise supported by medical or scientific evidence;
(b) The drug is prescribed by:
(1) A psychiatrist;
(2) A physician assistant under the supervision of a
psychiatrist;
(3) An advanced practice registered nurse who has the
psychiatric training and experience prescribed by the State Board of
Nursing pursuant to NRS 632.120; or
(4) A primary care provider that is providing care to an
insured in consultation with a practitioner listed in subparagraph (1),
(2) or (3), if the closest practitioner listed in subparagraph (1), (2) or
(3) who participates in Medicaid is located 60 miles or more from
the residence of the recipient; and
(c) The practitioner listed in paragraph (b) who prescribed the
drug knows, based on the medical history of the recipient, or
reasonably expects each alternative drug that is required to be used
earlier in the step therapy protocol to be ineffective at treating the
psychiatric condition.
4. The Department shall not require the Drug Use Review
Board to develop, review or approve prior authorization policies or
procedures necessary for the operation of the list of preferred
prescription drugs developed pursuant to NRS 422.4025.
5. The Department shall accept recommendations from the
Drug Use Review Board as the basis for developing or revising step
therapy protocols and prior authorization policies and procedures
used by the Medicaid program for prescription drugs.
6. As used in this section:
(a) “Medical or scientific evidence” has the meaning ascribed to
it in NRS 695G.053.
(b) “Step therapy protocol” means a procedure that requires a
recipient of Medicaid to use a prescription drug or sequence of
prescription drugs other than a drug that a practitioner recommends
for treatment of a psychiatric condition of the recipient before
Medicaid provides coverage for the recommended drug.
-
*AB290_R1*

– 27 –
Sec. 43. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 44. NRS 608.1555 is hereby amended to read as follows:
608.1555 Any employer who provides benefits for health care
to his or her employees shall provide the same benefits and pay
providers of health care in the same manner as a policy of insurance
pursuant to chapters 689A and 689B of NRS, including, without
limitation, as required by paragraphs (b) and (c) of subsection 2
and subsections 1, 3, 4 and 5 of NRS 687B.225, NRS 687B.409 [,
687B.723] and 687B.725 [.] and sections 2 to 18, inclusive, of this
act.
Sec. 45. 1. The amendatory provisions of this act do not
apply to a request for prior authorization submitted:
(a) Under a contract or policy of health insurance issued before
January 1, 2026, but apply to any request for prior authorization
submitted under any renewal of such a contract or policy.
(b) To the Department of Health and Human Services or a
Medicaid managed care entity, as defined in section 29.5 of this act,
before January 1, 2026, for medical or dental care provided to a
recipient of Medicaid or insurance under the Children’s Health
Insurance Program.
2. A health carrier must, in order to continue requiring prior
authorization in contracts or policies of health insurance issued or
renewed after January 1, 2026:
(a) Develop a procedure for obtaining prior authorization that
complies with NRS 687B.225, as amended by section 19 of this act,
and sections 2 to 18, inclusive, of this act; and
(b) Obtain the approval of the Commissioner of Insurance
pursuant to NRS 687B.225, as amended by section 19 of this act, for
the procedure developed pursuant to paragraph (a).
3. As used in this section, “health carrier” has the meaning
ascribed to it in section 5 of this act.
Sec. 46. The provisions of NRS 218D.380 do not apply to any
provision of this act which adds or revises a requirement to submit a
report to the Legislature.
Sec. 47. The provisions of NRS 354.599 do not apply to any
additional expenses of a local government that are related to the
provisions of this act.
Sec. 47.5. NRS 687B.723 and 695D.2153 are hereby repealed.
Sec. 48. 1. This section and section 45 of this act become
effective upon passage and approval.
2. Sections 1 to 44, inclusive, 46, 47 and 47.5 of this act
become effective:
(a) Upon passage and approval for the purpose of adopting any
regulations, performing any other preparatory administrative tasks
that are necessary to carry out the provisions of this act and
-
*AB290_R1*

– 28 –
approving procedures for obtaining prior authorization pursuant to
NRS 687B.225, as amended by section 19 of this act, and section 45
of this act; and
(b) On January 1, 2026, for all other purposes.
TEXT OF REPEALED SECTIONS
687B.723 Claim for dental care: Health carrier or
administrator of health benefit plan prohibited from denying
claim for which prior authorization has been granted;
exceptions.
1. A health carrier which provides dental coverage or an
administrator of a health benefit plan that includes dental coverage
shall not refuse to pay a claim for dental care for which the health
carrier or administrator, as applicable, has granted prior
authorization unless:
(a) A limitation on coverage provided under the applicable
health benefit plan, including, without limitation, a limitation on
total costs or frequency of services:
(1) Did not apply at the time the prior authorization was
granted; and
(2) Applied at the time of the provision of the dental care for
which the prior authorization was granted because additional
covered dental care was provided to the insured after the prior
authorization was granted and before the provision of the dental care
for which prior authorization was granted;
(b) The documentation provided by the person submitting the
claim clearly fails to support the claim for which prior authorization
was originally granted;
(c) After the prior authorization was granted, additional dental
care was provided to the insured or the condition of the insured
otherwise changed such that:
(1) The dental care for which prior authorization was granted
is no longer medically necessary; or
(2) The health carrier or administrator, as applicable, would
be required to deny prior authorization under the terms and
conditions of the applicable health benefit plan that were in effect at
the time of the provision of the dental care for which prior
authorization was granted;
(d) Another person or entity is responsible for the payment;
(e) The dentist has previously been paid for the procedures
covered by the claim;
-
*AB290_R1*

– 29 –
(f) The claim was fraudulent or the prior authorization was
based, in whole or in part, on materially false information provided
by the dentist or insured or another person who is not affiliated with
the health carrier or administrator, as applicable; or
(g) The insured was not eligible to receive the dental care for
which the claim was made on the date that the dental care was
provided.
2. Any provision of a contract that conflicts with this section is
against public policy, void and unenforceable.
3. As used in this section:
(a) “Medically necessary” means dental care that a prudent
dentist would provide to a patient to prevent, diagnose or treat an
illness, injury or disease, or any symptoms thereof, that is necessary
and:
(1) Provided in accordance with generally accepted standards
of dental practice;
(2) Clinically appropriate with regard to type, frequency,
extent, location and duration;
(3) Not primarily provided for the convenience of the patient
or dentist;
(4) Required to improve a specific dental condition of a
patient or to preserve the existing state of oral health of the patient;
and
(5) The most clinically appropriate level of dental care that
may be safely provided to the patient.
(b) “Prior authorization” means any communication issued by a
health carrier which provides dental coverage or an administrator of
a health benefit plan that includes dental coverage in response to a
request by a dentist in the form prescribed by the health carrier or
administrator, as applicable, which indicates that specific dental care
provided to an insured is:
(1) Covered under the health benefit plan issued to the
insured; and
(2) Reimbursable in a specific amount, subject to applicable
deductibles, copayments and coinsurance.
695D.2153 Claims: Organization for dental care or
administrator prohibited from denying claim for which prior
authorization has been granted; exceptions.
1. An organization for dental care or an administrator of a
dental plan shall not refuse to pay a claim for dental care for which
the organization for dental care or administrator, as applicable, has
granted prior authorization unless:
(a) A limitation on coverage provided under the applicable plan
for dental care, including, without limitation, a limitation on total
costs or frequency of services:
-
*AB290_R1*

– 30 –
(1) Did not apply at the time the prior authorization was
granted; and
(2) Applied at the time of the provision of the dental care for
which the prior authorization was granted because additional
covered dental care was provided to the member after the prior
authorization was granted and before the provision of the dental care
for which prior authorization was granted;
(b) The documentation provided by the person submitting the
claim clearly fails to support the claim for which prior authorization
was originally granted;
(c) After the prior authorization was granted, additional dental
care was provided to the member or the condition of the member
otherwise changed such that:
(1) The dental care for which prior authorization was granted
is no longer medically necessary; or
(2) The organization for dental care or administrator, as
applicable, would be required to deny prior authorization under the
terms and conditions of the applicable plan for dental care that were
in effect at the time of the provision of the dental care for which
prior authorization was granted;
(d) Another person or entity is responsible for the payment;
(e) The dentist has previously been paid for the procedures
covered by the claim;
(f) The claim was fraudulent or the prior authorization was
based, in whole or in part, on materially false information provided
by the dentist or member or another person who is not affiliated
with the organization for dental care or administrator, as applicable;
or
(g) The member was not eligible to receive the dental care for
which the claim was made on the date that the dental care was
provided.
2. Any provision of a contract that conflicts with this section is
against public policy, void and unenforceable.
3. As used in this section:
(a) “Medically necessary” means dental care that a prudent
dentist would provide to a patient to prevent, diagnose or treat an
illness, injury or disease, or any symptoms thereof, that is necessary
and:
(1) Provided in accordance with generally accepted standards
of dental practice;
(2) Clinically appropriate with regard to type, frequency,
extent, location and duration;
(3) Not primarily provided for the convenience of the patient
or dentist;
-
*AB290_R1*

– 31 –
(4) Required to improve a specific dental condition of a
patient or to preserve the existing state of oral health of the patient;
and
(5) The most clinically appropriate level of dental care that
may be safely provided to the patient.
(b) “Prior authorization” means any communication issued by
an organization for dental care or the administrator of a dental plan
in response to a request by a dentist in the form prescribed by the
organization for dental care or administrator, as applicable, which
indicates that specific dental care provided to a patient is:
(1) Covered under the plan for dental care issued to the
member; and
(2) Reimbursable in a specific amount, subject to applicable
deductibles, copayments and coinsurance.
H
-
*AB290_R1*